lexd/ru_lemmas/v.lexd
инҷāвен<v>:схватить<v>
инҷāвет<v>:схватить<v>
инҷāвум<v>:схватить<v>
инҷāм<v>:схватить<v>
инҷа<v>:схватить<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:схватить<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:схватить<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:схватить<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāв<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷāвен<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷāвет<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷāвум<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷāм<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷа<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷен<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷет<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷāв<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷāвен<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷāвет<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷāвум<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷāм<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷа<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:брать_в_жены<v>
анҷāв<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷāвен<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷāвет<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷāвум<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷāм<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷа<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷен<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷет<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷāв<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷāвен<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷāвет<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷāвум<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷāм<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷа<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:класть_сверху<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:класть_сверху<v>
анҷāв<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷāвен<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷāвет<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷāвум<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷāм<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷа<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷен<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷет<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷāв<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷāвен<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷāвет<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷāвум<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷāм<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷа<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:приступать_к_рассказу<v>
арāз<v>:прыгать<v>
арах̌т<v>:прыгать<v>
арах̌тоw<v>:прыгать<v>
арах̌ч<v>:прыгать<v>
арих̌тоw<v>:прыгать<v>
арих̌ц<v>:прыгать<v>
арозд<v>:прыгать<v>
аррāз<v>:прыгать<v>
аррах̌т<v>:прыгать<v>
аррах̌тоw<v>:прыгать<v>
аррах̌ч<v>:прыгать<v>
аррих̌тоw<v>:прыгать<v>
аррих̌ц<v>:прыгать<v>
аррозд<v>:прыгать<v>
аррух̌т<v>:прыгать<v>
аррух̌ч<v>:прыгать<v>
арух̌т<v>:прыгать<v>
арух̌ч<v>:прыгать<v>
арāз<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арах̌т<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арах̌тоw<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арах̌ч<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арих̌тоw<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арих̌ц<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арозд<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррāз<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррах̌т<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррах̌тоw<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррах̌ч<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррих̌тоw<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррих̌ц<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррозд<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррух̌т<v>:бить_ключом<v>
аррух̌ч<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арух̌т<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арух̌ч<v>:бить_ключом<v>
арāз<v>:чваниться<v>
арах̌т<v>:чваниться<v>
арах̌тоw<v>:чваниться<v>
арах̌ч<v>:чваниться<v>
арих̌тоw<v>:чваниться<v>
арих̌ц<v>:чваниться<v>
арозд<v>:чваниться<v>
аррāз<v>:чваниться<v>
аррах̌т<v>:чваниться<v>
аррах̌тоw<v>:чваниться<v>
аррах̌ч<v>:чваниться<v>
аррих̌тоw<v>:чваниться<v>
аррих̌ц<v>:чваниться<v>
аррозд<v>:чваниться<v>
аррух̌т<v>:чваниться<v>
аррух̌ч<v>:чваниться<v>
арух̌т<v>:чваниться<v>
арух̌ч<v>:чваниться<v>
арδӣх̌ц<v>:сниться<v>
арδӣх̌цт<v>:сниться<v>
арδӣх̌цтоw<v>:сниться<v>
арδӣх̌цтоw<v>:сниться<v>
арδӣх̌цч<v>:сниться<v>
арδӣх̌ц<v>:болтать<v>
арδӣх̌цт<v>:болтать<v>
арδӣх̌цтоw<v>:болтать<v>
арδӣх̌цтоw<v>:болтать<v>
арδӣх̌цч<v>:болтать<v>
бизӣδҷ<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣд<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣдоw<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣн<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣнт<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣδҷ<v>:арестовывать<v>
бизӣд<v>:арестовывать<v>
бизӣдоw<v>:арестовывать<v>
бизӣн<v>:арестовывать<v>
бизӣнт<v>:арестовывать<v>
бизӣδҷ<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣд<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣдоw<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣн<v>:помещать<v>
бизӣнт<v>:помещать<v>
бийу̊д<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊д<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊доw<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊йҷ<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊ӡ<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊ӡд<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊ӡдоw<v>:чесаться<v>
бийӣwдоw<v>:чесаться<v>
бийу̊ӡ<v>:раскалывать<v>
бийу̊ӡд<v>:раскалывать<v>
бийу̊ӡд<v>:раскалывать<v>
бийу̊ӡдоw<v>:раскалывать<v>
бийу̊ӡҷ<v>:раскалывать<v>
бийу̊ӡ<v>:расшибать<v>
бийу̊ӡд<v>:расшибать<v>
бийу̊ӡд<v>:расшибать<v>
бийу̊ӡдоw<v>:расшибать<v>
бийу̊ӡҷ<v>:расшибать<v>
бинêс<v>:терять<v>
бинêст<v>:терять<v>
бинêстоw<v>:терять<v>
бинêсч<v>:терять<v>
бинêс<v>:тратить<v>
бинêст<v>:тратить<v>
бинêстоw<v>:тратить<v>
бинêсч<v>:тратить<v>
бинêс<v>:губить<v>
бинêст<v>:губить<v>
бинêстоw<v>:губить<v>
бинêсч<v>:губить<v>
бинêс<v>:гнать<v>
бинêст<v>:гнать<v>
бинêстоw<v>:гнать<v>
бинêсч<v>:гнать<v>
бираф<v>:работать<v>
бирафт<v>:работать<v>
бирифт<v>:работать<v>
бирифтоw<v>:работать<v>
бирифч<v>:работать<v>
бирāw<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бираδҷ<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бирад<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
биридоw<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бириц<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
биру̊д<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бируδҷ<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бируд<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бируд<v>:перестать_питаться_материнским_молоком<v>
бирêw<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêwд<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêwдоw<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêwтоw<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêwч<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêwҷ<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бируδҷ<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бируд<v>:отнимать_от_груди<v>
бирêз<v>:пить<v>
бирêзд<v>:пить<v>
бирêх̌тоw<v>:пить<v>
бирох̌т<v>:пить<v>
бирох̌ч<v>:пить<v>
бисхир<v>:трогать<v>
бисхирт<v>:трогать<v>
бисхиртоw<v>:трогать<v>
бисхирч<v>:трогать<v>
бах̌ча<v>:черпать<v>
бах̌чам<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чāм<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чāр<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чāрен<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чāрет<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чāрум<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌ча<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чен<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чет<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чӣдоw<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чӣрт<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чӯд<v>:черпать<v>
бих̌чӯғ̌ҷ<v>:черпать<v>
бах̌ча<v>:хватать<v>
бах̌чам<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чāм<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чāр<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чāрен<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чāрет<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чāрум<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌ча<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чен<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чет<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чӣдоw<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чӣрт<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чӯд<v>:хватать<v>
бих̌чӯғ̌ҷ<v>:хватать<v>
биwайсен<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биwайсент<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биwайсентоw<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биwайсенч<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биғ̌айсен<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биғ̌айсент<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биғ̌айсентоw<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биғ̌айсенч<v>:доводить_до_распухания<v>
биwеδҷ<v>:опухать<v>
биwед<v>:опухать<v>
биwец<v>:опухать<v>
биwис<v>:опухать<v>
биwист<v>:опухать<v>
биwистоw<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌еδҷ<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌ед<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌едоw<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌ец<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌иδҷ<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌ис<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌ист<v>:опухать<v>
биғ̌истоw<v>:опухать<v>
биwеδҷ<v>:дуться<v>
биwед<v>:дуться<v>
биwец<v>:дуться<v>
биwис<v>:дуться<v>
биwист<v>:дуться<v>
биwистоw<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌еδҷ<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌ед<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌едоw<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌ец<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌иδҷ<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌ис<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌ист<v>:дуться<v>
биғ̌истоw<v>:дуться<v>
бӣл<v>:говорить<v>
бӣлт<v>:говорить<v>
бӣлтоw<v>:говорить<v>
бӣлч<v>:говорить<v>
бêзд<v>:играть<v>
бêх̌т<v>:играть<v>
бêх̌тоw<v>:играть<v>
бêх̌ч<v>:играть<v>
боз<v>:играть<v>
бозд<v>:играть<v>
бêзд<v>:посылать<v>
бêх̌тоw<v>:посылать<v>
боз<v>:посылать<v>
бозд<v>:посылать<v>
бох̌т<v>:посылать<v>
бох̌ч<v>:посылать<v>
бубез<v>:обходить<v>
бубезд<v>:обходить<v>
бубездоw<v>:обходить<v>
бубезҷ<v>:обходить<v>
бубрез<v>:обходить<v>
бубрезд<v>:обходить<v>
бубрездоw<v>:обходить<v>
бубрезҷ<v>:обходить<v>
бур<v>:квакать<v>
бурт<v>:квакать<v>
буртоw<v>:квакать<v>
бурч<v>:квакать<v>
бурз<v>:дрожать<v>
бурзд<v>:дрожать<v>
бурздоw<v>:дрожать<v>
бурзч<v>:дрожать<v>
бучақен<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақент<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақентоw<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақенч<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақу̊нт<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақу̊нтоw<v>:прыгать<v>
бучақу̊нч<v>:прыгать<v>
буғ<v>:жужжать<v>
буғд<v>:жужжать<v>
буғдоw<v>:жужжать<v>
буғч<v>:жужжать<v>
бӣw<v>:рыдать<v>
бӣwт<v>:рыдать<v>
бӣwтоw<v>:рыдать<v>
бӣwч<v>:рыдать<v>
бӯw<v>:рыдать<v>
бӯwт<v>:рыдать<v>
бӯwтоw<v>:рыдать<v>
бӯwч<v>:рыдать<v>
бу̊ғ<v>:мычать<v>
бу̊ғд<v>:мычать<v>
бу̊ғдоw<v>:мычать<v>
бу̊ғҷ<v>:мычать<v>
бу̊ғ<v>:шуметь<v>
бу̊ғд<v>:шуметь<v>
бу̊ғдоw<v>:шуметь<v>
бу̊ғҷ<v>:шуметь<v>
бу̊ғ<v>:насмехаться<v>
бу̊ғд<v>:насмехаться<v>
бу̊ғдоw<v>:насмехаться<v>
бу̊ғҷ<v>:насмехаться<v>
вāр-δêдоw<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δед<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δи<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δийи<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δийум<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δоδҷ<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δод<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δӣм<v>:мочь<v>
вāр-δêдоw<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δед<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δи<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δийи<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δийум<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δоδҷ<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δод<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δӣм<v>:справляться<v>
вāр-δêдоw<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δед<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δи<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δийи<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δийум<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δоδҷ<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δод<v>:уметь<v>
вāр-δӣм<v>:уметь<v>
виwāд<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwāн<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwоδҷ<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwӣδҷ<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwӣд<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwӣдоw<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwӣнт<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
виwӣц<v>:отказываться_от_еды<v>
видêӡ<v>:орошать<v>
видêӡд<v>:орошать<v>
видêӡдоw<v>:орошать<v>
видӣwдоw<v>:орошать<v>
видӯйд<v>:орошать<v>
видӯйҷ<v>:орошать<v>
вираw<v>:ломать<v>
вирағ̌<v>:ломать<v>
вирих̌тоw<v>:ломать<v>
вирух̌т<v>:ломать<v>
вирух̌ч<v>:ломать<v>
вирӣғ̌д<v>:ломать<v>
вираw<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вирағ̌<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вирих̌тоw<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вирух̌т<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вирух̌ч<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вирӣғ̌д<v>:обрабатывать<v>
вираw<v>:утолять<v>
вирағ̌<v>:утолять<v>
вирих̌тоw<v>:утолять<v>
вирух̌т<v>:утолять<v>
вирух̌ч<v>:утолять<v>
вирӣғ̌д<v>:утолять<v>
вираw<v>:пугать<v>
вирағ̌<v>:пугать<v>
вирих̌тоw<v>:пугать<v>
вирух̌т<v>:пугать<v>
вирух̌ч<v>:пугать<v>
вирӣғ̌д<v>:пугать<v>
вираw<v>:ломаться<v>
вирах̌т<v>:ломаться<v>
вирах̌ч<v>:ломаться<v>
вирағ̌<v>:ломаться<v>
вирих̌тоw<v>:ломаться<v>
вирих̌ц<v>:ломаться<v>
вироғ̌д<v>:ломаться<v>
вирух̌т<v>:ломаться<v>
вирух̌ч<v>:ломаться<v>
авед<v>:находить<v>
ави<v>:находить<v>
авийум<v>:находить<v>
авӣдоw<v>:находить<v>
авӣм<v>:находить<v>
авӯд<v>:находить<v>
авӯғ̌ҷ<v>:находить<v>
вирêдоw<v>:находить<v>
вирай<v>:находить<v>
виред<v>:находить<v>
вири<v>:находить<v>
вирийум<v>:находить<v>
вирӣм<v>:находить<v>
вирӯд<v>:находить<v>
вирӯғ̌ҷ<v>:находить<v>
винд<v>:связывать<v>
вӣнд<v>:связывать<v>
вӣнт<v>:связывать<v>
вӣс<v>:связывать<v>
вӣст<v>:связывать<v>
вӣстоw<v>:связывать<v>
вӣсч<v>:связывать<v>
вӯст<v>:связывать<v>
вӯсч<v>:связывать<v>
вӯшч<v>:связывать<v>
винд<v>:заключать<v>
вӣнд<v>:заключать<v>
вӣнт<v>:заключать<v>
вӣс<v>:заключать<v>
вӣст<v>:заключать<v>
вӣстоw<v>:заключать<v>
вӣсч<v>:заключать<v>
вӯст<v>:заключать<v>
вӯсч<v>:заключать<v>
вӯшч<v>:заключать<v>
винд<v>:застывать<v>
вӣнд<v>:застывать<v>
вӣнт<v>:застывать<v>
вӣс<v>:застывать<v>
вӣст<v>:застывать<v>
вӣстоw<v>:застывать<v>
вӣсч<v>:застывать<v>
вӯст<v>:застывать<v>
вӯсч<v>:застывать<v>
вӯшч<v>:застывать<v>
винд<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣнд<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣнт<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣс<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣст<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣстоw<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӣсч<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӯст<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӯсч<v>:околдовывать<v>
вӯшч<v>:околдовывать<v>
wарвен<v>:кипятить<v>
wарвент<v>:кипятить<v>
wарвентоw<v>:кипятить<v>
wарвенч<v>:кипятить<v>
wарвен<v>:печь<v>
wарвент<v>:печь<v>
wарвентоw<v>:печь<v>
wарвенч<v>:печь<v>
wарвен<v>:болтать<v>
wарвент<v>:болтать<v>
wарвентоw<v>:болтать<v>
wарвенч<v>:болтать<v>
wарwарθ<v>:возиться<v>
wарwарθт<v>:возиться<v>
wарwарθт<v>:возиться<v>
wарwарθтоw<v>:возиться<v>
wарwарθч<v>:возиться<v>
wарwарθ<v>:искать<v>
wарwарθт<v>:искать<v>
wарwарθт<v>:искать<v>
wарwарθтоw<v>:искать<v>
wарwарθч<v>:искать<v>
wарwарθ<v>:привыкать<v>
